Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1757.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7715. Firefighter cancer registry.(a) Establishment of registry.--The department shall develop and maintain a firefighter cancer registry, which shall be a voluntary registry of firefighters to collect relevant history and occupational information from firefighters that can be linked to available cancer registry data collected by existing Commonwealth cancer registries.(b) Registry requirements.--The department shall seek to include the following information for each firefighter included in the registry:123456789101112131415161718 (1) The age and demographic information of the firefighter.(2) The status of the firefighter as either a paid or volunteer firefighter.(3) The number of years working as a firefighter.(4) The number of fire incidents attended to by the firefighter, including the number of incidents involving a residential house fire, the number of incidents involving a commercial fire and the number of incidents involving any other type of fire.(5) Whether the firefighter's history includes smoking or drug use.(6) Relevant physical examination and medical history information.(7) Any additional information that is deemed necessary by the department.(c) Consulting experts.--For the purpose of developing and maintaining the registry, the department shall consult experts with experience in developing and maintaining cancer registries, studying cancer incidence, diagnosing and treating cancer and firefighting.(d) Reviewing data and providing public availability.--The department shall review data reported to the registry to identify trends in cancer incidence among firefighters throughout this Commonwealth, including identifying any regional disparities in cancer incidence and developing strategies to mitigate risk factors for firefighters developing cancer. The following apply:(1) The department shall make registry data available to the public and shall furnish epidemiological registry data, 20250HB1757PN2165 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without fee, to any entity requesting the data for research purposes. The department may authorize the use of registry information in journal articles and other print and Internet-based publications. Data made available under this subsection shall include raw, de-identified data, cancer incidence statistics and trends and other findings identified based on the department's review of registry data.(2) The department shall periodically review the registry to identify and implement improvements to registry infrastructure and Statewide monitoring of cancer incidence data and to develop a strategy for increasing awareness of the registry and maximizing the voluntary reporting of information to the registry.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any confidential or personal identifying information.(e) Reporting.--Beginning one year after the effective date of this subsection, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the Governor and to the General Assembly concerning its findings regarding trends in cancer incidence among firefighters in this Commonwealth, including any recommendations for reducing the cancer rate and risk factors for developing cancer among firefighters and recommendations for legislative, administrative or other action as may be appropriate to reduce cancer incidence among firefighters or to improve the functioning of, and participation in, the registry.(f) Confidentiality of information.--Names and individual identification data collected under this section shall not be disclosed unless required by law, and nothing in this section shall be construed to require disclosure of any private or 20250HB1757PN2165 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 confidential health information in violation of Federal or State privacy laws. Information reported to the registry shall not be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding and shall not constitute the basis for any professional or administrative disciplinary action against an individual reporting the individual's own information to the registry.(g) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Registry." The firefighter cancer registry established under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1757PN2165 - 4 - 12345678910111213